Massachusetts, session 194th, H2747.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
The definition of Group 4, as set forth in Chapter 32, Section 3, paragraph (2),
subparagraph (g) is hereby amended by adding thereto the words:— the secretary and
undersecretaries of public safety, provided they had previously served in a Group 3 or 4
designated position for no less than 24 consecutive months.
of 1